Mississippi statutes. Title 69. Agriculture, Horticulture, and Animals
Article 11. Natural Resources Conservation Education Fund.

§ 69-27-401.
Creation of fund; purpose and use of monies in fund.

There is created in the State Treasury a special fund to be designated as the “Natural Resources Conservation Education Fund.” The fund shall consist of such monies as are required to be deposited therein under Section 27-19-56.19; any gifts, grants or other contributions from any federal, state or local government or any person, firm or corporation; and such other monies as the Legislature may appropriate or authorize to be deposited into the fund. Monies in the fund may be used upon appropriation by the Legislature, by the Mississippi Soil and Water Conservation Commission to develop, produce and distribute materials used to educate individuals, groups or both, as to the natural resources of the State of Mississippi and the conservation of such resources.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 536, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 2000.